Tennessee statutes. Title 28 Limitation Of Actions
Part 3

Limitations on Utility Charges

28-3-301. Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments — Electrical service.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if kilowatt usage is inaccurately recorded or registered due to equipment failure and results in a customer being undercharged or overcharged, and the customer is unaware of the error, defect or failure, no utility district, municipality or electric company shall be authorized to collect or assess a charge for such usage, or to reimburse the customer for overpayment of such usage, prior to thirty-six (36) months from the date the error is discovered and billed; provided, that if a date certain can be established for such error which is less than thirty-six (36) months, no utility district, municipality or electric company shall be authorized to collect or assess a charge for such usage, or to reimburse the customer for overpayment of such usage, beyond such date.

Acts 1989, ch. 411, § 1.

28-3-302. Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments — Water or sewer service.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if gallonage for water or sewer service or both is inaccurately recorded or registered due to equipment failure and results in the customer being undercharged or overcharged, and the customer is unaware of the error, defect or failure, no utility district, municipality, or water or sewer system or company shall be authorized to collect or assess a charge for the unpaid gallonage or to reimburse the customer for overpayment of such usage, prior to thirty-six (36) months from the date the error is discovered and billed; provided, that if a date certain can be established for such error which is less than thirty-six (36) months, no utility district, municipality, or water or sewer system or company shall be authorized to collect or assess a charge for such usage, or to reimburse the customer for overpayment of such usage, beyond such date.

Acts 1989, ch. 411, § 2.

28-3-303. Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments — Gas service.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if cubic feet for gas service is inaccurately recorded or registered due to equipment failure and results in the customer being undercharged or overcharged, and the customer is unaware of the error, defect or failure, no utility district, municipality, or gas system or company shall be authorized to collect or assess a charge for the unpaid cubic feet or to reimburse the customer for overpayment of such usage, prior to thirty-six (36) months from the date the error is discovered and billed; provided, that if a date certain can be established for such error which is less than thirty-six (36) months, no utility district, municipality, or gas system or company shall be authorized to collect or assess a charge for such usage, or to reimburse the customer for overpayment of such usage, beyond such date.

Acts 1989, ch. 411, § 3.

28-3-304. Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments — Solid waste, garbage or refuse collection or disposal.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a municipality shall not refund an overpayment or collect amounts owed to the municipality as a result of an underpayment or nonpayment of any charge or fee imposed for solid waste, garbage, or refuse collection or disposal services if such overpayment, underpayment, or nonpayment is more than thirty-six (36) months past the date payment was first due.

Acts 2004, ch. 692, § 1.